Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2608
Recording.

(a) An environmental covenant, any amendment or termination of the covenant under section 76-2609 or 76-2610, and any subordination agreement must be recorded in every county in which any portion of the real property subject to the covenant is located. For purposes of indexing, a holder shall be treated as a grantee.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of section 76-2609, an environmental covenant is subject to the laws of this state governing recording and priority of interests in real property.

(c) A copy of a document recorded under subsection (a) of this section shall also be provided to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment if the department has not signed the covenant.

(d) The department shall make available to the public a listing of all documents under subsection (a) of this section or documents under subsection (c) of this section which have been provided to the department.

Laws 2005, LB 298, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 95;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 387.